Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.216

County auditor—Duties—Exceptions.

The county auditor of each county shall be ex officio the supervisor of all primaries and elections, general or special, and it shall be the county auditor's duty to provide places for holding such primaries and elections; to provide the supplies and materials necessary for the conduct of elections; and to publish and post notices of calling such primaries and elections in the manner provided by law. The auditor shall also apportion to the county, each city, town, or district, and to the state of Washington, its share of the expense of such primaries and elections. This section does not apply to general or special elections for any city, town, or district that is not subject to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, but all such elections must be held and conducted at the time, in the manner, and by the officials (with such notice, requirements for filing for office, and certifications by local officers) as provided and required by the laws governing such elections. State and federal offices are to be considered one entity for purposes of election cost proration and reimbursement.

[ 2020 c 337 s 3; 2013 c 11 s 7; 2011 c 10 s 6; 2004 c 271 s 104.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 337: See note following RCW 29A.04.410.

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.